California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
(b) If recognition of a foreign-country judgment is sought in a pending action, the issue of recognition may be raised by counterclaim, cross-claim, or affirmative defense.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 212, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1719.

If the court in a proceeding under Section 1718 finds that the foreign-country judgment is entitled to recognition under this chapter then, to the extent that the foreign-country judgment grants or denies recovery of a sum of money, the foreign-country judgment is both of the following:

(a) Conclusive between the parties to the same extent as the judgment of a sister state entitled to full faith and credit in this state would be conclusive.

(b) Enforceable in the same manner and to the same extent as a judgment rendered in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 212, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1720.

If a party establishes that an appeal from a foreign-country judgment is pending or will be taken in the foreign country, the court may stay any proceedings with regard to the foreign-country judgment until the appeal is concluded, the time for appeal expires, or the appellant has had sufficient time to prosecute the appeal and has failed to do so.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 212, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1721.

An action to recognize a foreign-country judgment shall be commenced within the earlier of the time during which the foreign-country judgment is effective in the foreign country or 10 years from the date that the foreign-country judgment became effective in the foreign country.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 212, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1722.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 212, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1723.

This chapter does not prevent the recognition under principles of comity or otherwise of a foreign-country judgment not within the scope of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 212, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1724.

(a) This chapter applies to all actions commenced on or after the effective date of this chapter in which the issue of recognition of a foreign-country judgment is raised.

(b) The former Uniform Foreign Money-Judgments Recognition Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1713) of Title 11 of Part 3) applies to all actions commenced before the effective date of this chapter in which the issue of recognition of a foreign-country judgment is raised.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 212, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1725.

(a) If all of the following conditions are satisfied, a person against whom a foreign-country defamation judgment was rendered may seek declaratory relief with respect to liability for the judgment or a determination that the judgment is not recognizable under section 1716:

(1) The person is a resident or other person or entity amendable to jurisdiction in this state.

(2) The person either has assets in this state that may be subject to an enforcement proceeding to satisfy the foreign-country defamation judgment or may have to take actions in this state to comply with the foreign-country defamation judgment.

(3) The publication at issue was published in this state.

(b) A court of this state has jurisdiction to determine a declaratory relief action or issue a determination pursuant to this section and has personal jurisdiction over the person or entity who obtained the foreign-country defamation judgment.

(c) This section shall apply to a foreign-country defamation judgment regardless of when it was rendered.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 168, Sec. 7.   (AB 905)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Tribal Court Civil Money Judgment Act [1730. - 1741.]

1730.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Tribal Court Civil Money Judgment Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 168, Sec. 10.   (AB 905)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1731.

(a) This chapter governs the procedures by which the superior courts of the State of California recognize and enter tribal court money judgments of any federally recognized Indian tribe. Determinations regarding recognition and entry of a tribal court money judgment pursuant to state law shall have no effect upon the independent authority of that judgment. To the extent not inconsistent with this chapter, the Code of Civil Procedure shall apply.

(b) This chapter does not apply to any of the following tribal court money judgments:

(1) For taxes, fines, or other
 penalties, except for tribal taxes as described in clause 3 of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 1616 of Article 10 of Chapter 4 of Division 2 of Title 18 of the California Code of Regulations, and related interest or penalties.

(2) For which federal law requires that states grant full faith and
 credit recognition, including child support orders under the Full Faith and Credit for Child Support Orders Act (28 U.S.C. Sec. 1738B), except for the purposes of recognizing a tribal court order establishing the right of a child or other dependent of a participant in a retirement plan or other plan of deferred compensation to an assignment of all or a portion of the benefits payable.

(3) For which state law provides for recognition, including child support orders recognized under the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act (Part 3 (commencing with Section 3400) of Division 8 of the Family Code), other forms of family support orders under the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (Part 6 (commencing with Section 5700.101) of Division 9 of the Family Code), except for the purposes of recognizing a tribal court
 order establishing the right of a spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent of a participant in a retirement plan or other plan of deferred compensation to an assignment of all or a portion of the benefits payable.

(4) For decedents’ estates, guardianships, conservatorships, internal affairs of trusts, powers of attorney, or other tribal court money judgments that arise in proceedings that are or would be governed by the Probate Code.

(c) Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed or construed to expand or limit the jurisdiction of either the state or any Indian tribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 138, Sec. 1.   (AB 1139)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1732.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Applicant” means the person or persons who can bring an action to enforce a tribal court money judgment.

(b) “Civil action or proceeding” means any action or proceeding that is not criminal, except for those actions or proceedings expressly excluded by subdivision (b) of Section
 1731.

(c) “Due process” includes, but is not limited to, the right to be represented by legal counsel, to receive reasonable notice and an opportunity for a hearing, to call and cross-examine witnesses, and to present evidence and argument to an impartial decisionmaker.

(d) “Good cause” means a substantial reason, taking into account the prejudice or irreparable harm a party will suffer if a hearing is not held on an objection or not held within the time periods established by this chapter.

(e) “Respondent” means the person or persons against whom an action to enforce a tribal court money judgment can be brought.

(f) “Tribal court” means any court or other tribunal of any federally recognized Indian nation, tribe, pueblo, band, or Alaska Native village,
 duly established under tribal or federal law, including Courts of Indian Offenses organized pursuant to Part 11 of Title 25 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(g) “Tribal court money judgment” means any written judgment, decree, or order of a tribal court for a specified amount of money that was issued in a civil action or proceeding that is final, conclusive, and enforceable by the tribal court in which it was issued and is duly authenticated in accordance with the laws and procedures of the tribe or tribal court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 168, Sec. 12.   (AB 905)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1733.

(a) An application for entry of a judgment under this chapter shall be filed in a superior court.

(b) Subject to the power of the court to transfer proceedings under this chapter pursuant to Title 4 (commencing with Section 392) of Part 2, and except as provided in Section 1733.1, the proper county for the filing of an application is either of the following:

(1) The county in which any respondent resides or owns property.

(2) If no respondent is a resident, any county in this state.

(c) A case in which the tribal court money judgment amounts to
 thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) or less is a limited civil case.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 861, Sec. 8.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1733.1.

(a) (1) If the parties to the underlying tribal court proceeding agree, the parties may file a joint application for the recognition of a tribal court order that establishes a right to child support, spousal support payments, or marital property rights to such spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent of a participant in a retirement plan or other plan of deferred compensation, which order assigns all or a portion of the benefits payable with respect to the participant to an alternate payee.

(2) If one of the parties to a tribal court order described in paragraph (1) does not agree to join in the application, the other party may proceed by having the tribal court
 execute a certificate in lieu of the signature of the other party. The Judicial Council shall adopt a format for the certificate.

(3) The application shall be on a form adopted by the Judicial Council, executed under penalty of perjury by parties to the
 proceeding submitting the application.

(4) The application shall include the name, current address, telephone number, and email address of each party, the name and mailing address of the issuing tribal court, and a certified copy of the order to be recognized.

(b) The filing fee for an application filed under this section is one hundred dollars ($100).

(c) An application filed pursuant to this section may be filed in the county in which either one of the parties resides.

(d) Entry of the tribal court order under this section does not confer any jurisdiction on a court of this state to modify or enforce the tribal court
 order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 420, Sec. 14.   (AB 2960)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1734.

(a) An applicant may apply for recognition and entry of a judgment based on a tribal court money judgment by filing an application in superior court pursuant to Section 1733.

(b) The application shall be executed under penalty of perjury and include all of the following information:

(1) The name and address of the tribal court that issued the judgment to be enforced and the date of the tribal court money judgment or any renewal thereof.

(2) The name and address of the party seeking recognition.

(3) (A) Any of the following statements, as applicable:

(i) If the respondent is an individual, the name and last known residence address of the respondent.

(ii) If the respondent is a corporation, the corporation’s name, place of incorporation, and whether the corporation, if foreign, has qualified to do business in this state under the provisions of Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 2100) of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code.

(iii) If the respondent is a partnership, the name of the partnership, whether it is a foreign partnership, and if it is a foreign partnership, whether it has filed a statement pursuant to Section 15800 of the Corporations Code designating an agent for service of process.

(iv) If the respondent is a limited liability company, the company’s name, whether it is a foreign company, and if so, whether it has filed a statement pursuant to Section 17060 of the Corporations Code.

(B) Except for facts that are matters of public record in this state, the statements required by this paragraph may be made on the basis of the applicant’s information and belief.

(4) A statement that an action in this state to enforce the tribal court money judgment is not barred by the applicable statute of limitations.

(5) A statement, based on the applicant’s information and belief, that the tribal court money judgment is final and that no stay of enforcement of the tribal court money judgment is currently in effect.

(6) A statement that includes all of the following:

(A) The amount of the award granted in the tribal court money judgment that remains unpaid.

(B) If accrued interest on the tribal court money judgment is to be included in the California judgment, the amount of interest accrued on the tribal court money judgment, computed at the rate of interest applicable to the judgment under the law of the tribal jurisdiction in which the tribal court money judgment was issued.

(C) The rate of interest
 applicable to the money judgment under the law of the jurisdiction in which the tribal court money judgment was issued.

(D) A citation to the supporting authority.

(7) A statement that no action based on the tribal court money judgment is currently pending in any state court and that no judgment based on the tribal court money judgment has previously been entered in any proceeding in this state.

(c) All of the following items shall be attached to the application:

(1) An authenticated copy of the tribal court money judgment, certified by the judge or clerk of the tribal court.

(2) A copy of the tribal court rules of procedure pursuant to which the tribal court money judgment was
 entered.

(3) A declaration under penalty of perjury by the tribal court clerk, applicant, or applicant’s attorney stating, based on personal knowledge, that the case that resulted in the entry of the judgment was conducted in compliance with the tribal court’s rules of procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 243, Sec. 4.   (SB 406)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1735.

(a) Promptly upon the filing of an application pursuant to Section 1734, the applicant shall serve upon the respondent a notice of filing of the application to recognize and enter the tribal court money judgment, together with a copy of the application and any documents filed with the application. The notice of filing shall be in a form that shall be prescribed by the Judicial Council, and shall inform the respondent that the respondent has 30 days from service of the notice of filing to file objections to the enforcement of the tribal court money judgment. The notice shall include the name and address of the applicant and
 the applicant’s attorney, if any, and the text of Sections 1736 and 1737.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), service shall be made in the manner provided for service of summons by Article 3 (commencing with Section 415.10) of Chapter 4 of Title 5 of Part 2.

(c) If a respondent is the State of California or any of its officers, employees, departments, agencies, boards, or commissions, service of the notice of filing on that respondent may be by mail to the office of the Attorney General.

(d) The fee for service of the notice of filing under this section is an item of costs recoverable in the same manner as statutory fees for service of a writ as provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 685.010) of Division 1 of Title 9 of Part 2, but the recoverable amount for that fee shall not exceed the amount allowed
 to a public officer or employee of this state for that service.

(e) The applicant shall file a proof of service of the notice promptly following service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 58, Sec. 4.   (AB 627)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1736.

(a) If no objections are timely filed in accordance with Section 1737, the clerk shall certify that no objections were timely filed, and a judgment shall be entered.

(b) The judgment entered by the superior court shall be based on and contain the provisions and terms of the tribal court money judgment. The judgment shall be entered in the same manner, have the same effect, and be enforceable in the same manner as any civil judgment, order, or decree of a court of this state, except as provided in Section 1733.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 58, Sec. 5.   (AB 627)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1737.

(a) Any objection to the recognition and entry of the tribal court money judgment sought under Section 1734 shall be served and filed within 30 days of service of the notice of filing. If any objection is filed within this time period, the superior court shall set a time period for replies and set the matter for a hearing. The hearing shall be held by the superior court within 45 days from the date the objection is filed unless good cause exists for a later hearing. The only grounds for objecting to the recognition or enforcement of a tribal court money judgment are the grounds set forth in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d).

(b) A tribal court money judgment shall
 not be recognized and entered if the respondent demonstrates to the superior court that at least one of the following occurred:

(1) The tribal court did not have personal jurisdiction over the respondent.

(2) The tribal court did not have jurisdiction over the subject matter.

(3) The judgment was rendered under a judicial system that does not provide impartial tribunals or procedures compatible with the requirements of due process of law.

(c) (1) The superior court shall decline to recognize and enter a tribal court money judgment if any one of the following grounds applies:

(A) The defendant in the proceeding in the tribal court did not receive notice of the
 proceeding in sufficient time to enable the defendant to defend.

(B) The judgment was obtained by fraud that deprived the losing party of an adequate opportunity to present its case.

(C) The judgment or the cause of action or claim for relief on which the judgment is based is repugnant to the public policy of the state or of the United States.

(D) The proceeding in the tribal court was contrary to an agreement between the parties under which the dispute in question was to be determined otherwise than by proceedings in that tribal court.

(E) In the case of jurisdiction based on personal service only, the tribal court was a seriously inconvenient forum for the trial of the action.

(F) The
 judgment was rendered under circumstances that raise substantial doubt about the integrity of the rendering court with respect to the judgment.

(G) The specific proceeding in the tribal court leading to the judgment was not compatible with the requirements of due process of law.

(H) The judgment includes recovery for a claim of defamation, unless the court determines that the defamation law applied by the tribal court provided at least as much protection for freedom of speech and the press as provided by both the United States and California Constitutions.

(2) Notwithstanding an applicable ground for nonrecognition under paragraph (1), the court may nonetheless recognize a tribal court money judgment if the applicant demonstrates good reason to recognize the judgment that outweighs the ground for nonrecognition.

(d) The superior court may, in its discretion, decline to recognize and enter a tribal court money judgment if the judgment conflicts with another final and conclusive judgment.

(e) If objections have been timely filed, the applicant has the burden of establishing that the tribal court money judgment is entitled to recognition. If the applicant has met its burden, a party resisting recognition of the tribal court money judgment has the burden of establishing that a ground for nonrecognition exists pursuant to subdivision (b), (c), or (d).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 58, Sec. 6.   (AB 627)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1738.

The superior court shall grant a stay of enforcement if the respondent establishes one of the following to the superior court:

(a) An appeal from the tribal court money judgment is pending or may be taken in the tribal court, in which case the superior court shall stay state execution of the tribal court money judgment until the proceeding on appeal has been
 concluded or the time for appeal has expired.

(b) A stay of enforcement of the tribal court money judgment has been granted by the tribal court, in which case the superior court shall stay enforcement of the tribal court money judgment until the stay of execution expires or is vacated.

(c) Any other circumstance exists where the interests of justice require a stay of enforcement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 243, Sec. 4.   (SB 406)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1739.

An action to recognize a tribal court money judgment or any renewal thereof shall be commenced within the earlier of the following periods:

(a) The time during which the tribal court money judgment is effective within the territorial jurisdiction of the tribal court.

(b) Ten years from the date that
 the tribal court money judgment became effective in the tribal jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 243, Sec. 4.   (SB 406)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1740.

(a) The superior court may, after notice to all parties, attempt to resolve any issues raised regarding a tribal court money judgment by contacting the tribal court judge who issued the judgment.

(b) The superior court shall allow the parties to participate in, and shall prepare a record of, any communication made with the tribal court judge
 pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 243, Sec. 4.   (SB 406)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1741.

(a) The Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1713)) applies to all actions commenced in superior court before January 1, 2015, in which the issue of recognition of a tribal court money judgment is raised.

(b) This chapter applies to all actions to enforce tribal court money judgments as defined herein
 commenced in superior court on or after January 1, 2015. A judgment entered under this chapter shall not limit the right of a party to seek enforcement of any part of a judgment, order, or decree entered by a tribal court that is not encompassed by the judgment entered under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 168, Sec. 15.   (AB 905)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 11.6. CIVIL ACTION MEDIATION [1775. - 1775.15.]

1775.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(a) The peaceful resolution of disputes in a fair, timely, appropriate, and cost-effective manner is an essential function of the judicial branch of state government under Article VI of the California Constitution.

(b) In the case of many disputes, litigation culminating in a trial is costly, time consuming, and stressful for the parties involved. Many disputes can be resolved in a fair and
 equitable manner through less formal processes.

(c) Alternative processes for reducing the cost, time, and stress of dispute resolution, such as mediation, have been effectively used in California and elsewhere. In appropriate cases mediation provides parties with a simplified and economical procedure for obtaining prompt and equitable resolution of their disputes and a greater opportunity to participate directly in resolving these disputes. Mediation may also assist to reduce the backlog of cases burdening the judicial system. It is in the public interest for mediation to be encouraged and used where appropriate by the courts.

(d) Mediation and similar alternative processes can have the greatest benefit for the parties in a civil action when used early, before substantial discovery and other litigation costs have been incurred. Where appropriate, participants in disputes should
 be encouraged to utilize mediation and other alternatives to trial for resolving their differences in the early stages of a civil action.

(e) As a pilot project in Los Angeles County and in other counties which elect to apply this title, courts should be able to refer cases to appropriate dispute resolution processes such as judicial arbitration and mediation as an alternative to trial, consistent with the parties’ right to obtain a trial if a dispute is not resolved through an alternative process.

(f) The purpose of this title is to encourage the use of court-annexed alternative dispute resolution methods in general, and mediation in particular. It is estimated that the average cost to the court for processing a civil case of the kind described in Section 1775.3 through judgment is three thousand nine hundred forty-three dollars ($3,943) for each judge day, and that a substantial
 portion of this cost can be saved if these cases are resolved before trial.

The Judicial Council, through the Administrative Office of the Courts, shall conduct a survey to determine the number of cases resolved by alternative dispute resolution authorized by this title, and shall estimate the resulting savings realized by the courts and the parties. The results of the survey shall be included in the report submitted pursuant to Section 1775.14. The programs authorized by this title shall be deemed successful if they result in estimated savings of at least two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) to the courts and corresponding savings to the parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1261, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1775.1.

(a) As used in this title, “mediation” means a process in which a neutral person or persons facilitate communication between the disputants to assist them in reaching a mutually acceptable agreement.

(b) Unless otherwise specified in this title or ordered by the court, any act to be performed by a party may also be performed by his or her counsel of record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 87.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1775.2.

(a) This title shall apply to the courts of the County of Los Angeles.

(b) A court of any county, at the option of the presiding judge, may elect whether or not to apply this title to eligible actions filed in that court, and this title shall not apply in any court which has not so elected. An election under this subdivision may be revoked by the court at any time.

(c) Courts are authorized to apply this title to
 all civil actions pending or commenced on or after January 1, 1994.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1261, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1775.3.

(a) In the courts of the County of Los Angeles and in other courts that elect to apply this title, all at-issue civil actions in which arbitration is otherwise required pursuant to Section 1141.11, whether or not the action includes a prayer for equitable relief, may be submitted to mediation by the presiding judge or the judge designated under this title as an alternative to judicial arbitration pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1141.10) of Title 3.

(b) Any civil
 action otherwise within the scope of this title in which a party to the action is a public agency or public entity may be submitted to mediation pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1261, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1775.4.

An action that has been ordered into arbitration pursuant to Section 1141.11 or 1141.12 may not be ordered into mediation under this title, and an action that has been ordered into mediation pursuant to Section 1775.3 may not be ordered into arbitration pursuant to Section 1141.11.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1261, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1775.5.

(a) The court shall not order a case into mediation where the amount in controversy exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). The determination of the amount in controversy shall be made in the same manner as provided in Section 1141.16 and, in making this determination, the court shall not consider the merits of questions of liability, defenses, or comparative negligence.

(b) This section shall remain in effect until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 201, Sec. 1.   (AB 1523)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 2 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 201.)
-------------------------------------------

1775.5.

(a) The court shall not order a case into mediation unless all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The amount in controversy does not exceed seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000). The determination of the amount in controversy shall be made in the same manner as provided in Section 1141.16 and, in making this determination, the court shall not consider the merits of questions of liability, defenses, or comparative negligence.

(2) The case has been set for trial.

(3) At least one party has notified the court of its interest in mediation.

(4) There are no ongoing discovery disputes impacting the case.

(5) The parties have been notified of their option to stipulate to a mutually agreeable mediator.

(6) The parties have the ability to mediate through the use of remote technology upon the stipulation of all parties.

(b) If the parties do not stipulate to a mutually agreeable mediator within 15 days of the date the case is submitted to mediation, the court shall select a mediator, at no cost to the parties, pursuant to standards adopted by the Judicial Council.

(c) All parties and counsel attending the mediation shall comply with subdivision
 (a) of Rule 3.894 of the California Rules of Court, except that the parties may utilize any means of remote technology in accordance with the stipulation provided in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a).

(d) Mediation ordered pursuant to subdivision (a) shall conclude in the form of a mutually acceptable agreement or statement of nonagreement, as described in Section 1775.9, no later than 120 days before the trial date described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). Any mediation shall not delay the trial date described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(e) The determination and any stipulation of the amount in controversy shall be without prejudice as to any finding on the value of the case.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 201, Sec. 2.   (AB 1523)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1775.6.

In actions submitted to mediation pursuant to Section 1775.3, a mediator shall be selected for the action within 30 days of its submission to mediation. The method of selection and qualification of the mediator shall be as the parties determine. If the parties are unable to agree on a mediator within 15 days of the date of submission of the action to mediation, the court may select a mediator pursuant to standards adopted by the Judicial Council.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1261, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1775.7.

(a) Submission of an action to mediation pursuant to this title shall not suspend the running of the time periods specified in Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 583.110) of Title 8 of Part 2, except as provided in this section.

(b) If an action is or remains submitted to mediation pursuant to this title more than four years and six months after the plaintiff has filed the action, then the time beginning on the date four years and six months after the plaintiff has filed the
 action and ending on the date on which a statement of nonagreement is filed pursuant to Section 1775.9 shall not be included in computing the five-year period specified in Section 583.310.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1261, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1775.8.

(a) The compensation of court-appointed mediators shall be the same as the compensation of arbitrators pursuant to Section 1141.18, except that no compensation shall be paid prior to the filing of a statement of nonagreement by the mediator pursuant to Section 1775.9 or prior to settlement of the action by the parties.

(b) All administrative costs of mediation, including compensation of mediators, shall be paid in the same manner as for arbitration pursuant to Section 1141.28.
 Funds allocated for the payment of arbitrators under the judicial arbitration program shall be equally available for the payment of mediators under this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1261, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1775.9.

(a) In the event that the parties to mediation are unable to reach a mutually acceptable agreement and any party to the mediation wishes to terminate the mediation, then the mediator shall file a statement of nonagreement. This statement shall be in a form to be developed by the Judicial Council.

(b) Upon the filing of a statement of nonagreement, the matter shall be calendared for trial, by court or jury, both as to law and fact, insofar as possible, so that the trial shall be
 given the same place on the active list as it had prior to mediation, or shall receive civil priority on the next setting calendar.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1261, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1775.10.

All statements made by the parties during the mediation shall be subject to Sections 703.5 and 1152, and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1115) of Division 9, of the Evidence Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 772, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1775.11.

Any party who participates in mediation pursuant to Section 1775.3 shall retain the right to obtain discovery to the extent available under the Civil Discovery Act, Title 4 (commencing with Section 2016.010) of Part 4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 182, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 64 of Ch. 182.)
-------------------------------------------

1775.12.

Any reference to the mediation or the statement of nonagreement filed pursuant to Section 1775.9 during any subsequent trial shall constitute an irregularity in the proceedings of the trial for the purposes of Section 657.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1261, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1775.13.

It is the intent of the Legislature that nothing in this title be construed to preempt other current or future alternative dispute resolution programs operating in the trial courts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1261, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1775.14.

(a) On or before January 1, 1998, the Judicial Council shall submit a report to the Legislature concerning court alternative dispute resolution programs. This report shall include, but not be limited to, a review of programs operated in Los Angeles County and other courts that have elected to apply this title, and shall examine, among other things, the effect of this title on the judicial arbitration programs of courts that have participated in that program.

(b) The Judicial
 Council shall, by rule, require that each court applying this title file with the Judicial Council data that will enable the Judicial Council to submit the report required by subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 74.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1775.15.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law except the provisions of this title, the Judicial Council shall provide by rule for all of the following:

(a) The procedures to be followed in submitting actions to mediation under this act.

(b) Coordination of the procedures and processes under this act with those under the trial Court Delay Reduction Act, Article 5 (commencing with Section 68600) of Chapter 2 of Title 8 of the Government
 Code.

(c) Exceptions for cause from provisions of this title. In providing for exceptions, the Judicial Council shall take into consideration whether the civil action might not be amenable to mediation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1261, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 11.7. RECOVERY OF PREFERENCES AND EXEMPT PROPERTY IN AN ASSIGNMENT FOR THE BENEFIT OF CREDITORS [1800. - 1802.]

1800.

(a) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Insolvent” means:

(A) With reference to a person other than a partnership, a financial condition such that the sum of the person’s debts is greater than all of the
 person’s property, at a fair valuation, exclusive of both of the following:

(i) Property transferred, concealed, or removed with intent to hinder, delay, or defraud the person’s creditors.

(ii) Property that is exempt from property of the estate pursuant to the election of the person made pursuant to Section 1801.

(B) With reference to a partnership, financial condition such that the sum of the partnership’s debts are greater than the aggregate of, at a fair valuation, both of the following:

(i) All of the partnership’s property, exclusive of property of the kind specified in clause (i) of subparagraph (A).

(ii) The sum of the excess of the value of each general partner’s separate
 property, exclusive of property of the kind specified in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A), over the partner’s separate debts.

(2) “Inventory” means personal property leased or furnished, held for sale or lease, or to be furnished under a contract for service, raw materials, work in process, or materials used or consumed in a business, including farm products such as crops or livestock, held for sale or lease.

(3) “Insider” means:

(A) If the assignor is an individual, any of the following:

(i) A relative of the assignor or of a general partner of the assignor.

(ii) A partnership in which the assignor is a general partner.

(iii) A general partner of the assignor.

(iv) A corporation of which the assignor is a director, officer, or person in control.

(B) If the assignor is a corporation, any of the following:

(i) A director of the assignor.

(ii) An officer of the assignor.

(iii) A person in control of the assignor.

(iv) A partnership in which the assignor is a general partner.

(v) A general partner of the assignor.

(vi) A relative of a general partner, director, officer, or person in control of the
 assignor.
